Wyoming, session 2025, HB0142.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118,
Section 2, Section 027 is amended to read:

Section 027. STATE CONSTRUCTION DEPARTMENT
PROGRAM
Operations 1,929,954 5,082,079 S5 7,012,033
School Facilities Div. 180,337,954 S5 180,337,954
183,225,575 S5 183,225,575
Construction Management 1,610,806 1,610,806
TOTALS 3,540,760 0 185,420,033 188,960,793
188,307,654 191,848,414

HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 29
Part Time 0
TOTAL 29

Section 2. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118,
Section 313(f), (j)(iv)(intro), (v), (vii), (viii), (xii)
and by creating a new subsection (k) is amended to read:

[SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION]

Section 313.

(f) An estimated schedule for deploying
projects funded by amounts appropriated under
subsection (j) of this section, as adopted by the
school facilities commission and as contained
within the 2025-2026 biennial budget, inclusive
of the supplemental budget request, submitted by
the commission under W.S. 21-15-119, and further
refined by the budget submitted by the governor's
office, shall be used by the state construction
department to the extent practicable to guide
HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220
expenditure of appropriated funds, subject to
restrictions contained in W.S. 21-15-119(c). The
estimated schedule shall be based upon
information, processes, events and expenditures
and shall not be binding upon the state
construction department or the school facilities
commission.

(j) The following amounts are appropriated
from the school foundation program account to the
school facilities commission for the following
purposes:

(iv) For construction of the following
school building and facility projects, two
hundred forty-one million three hundred seventy-
four thousand thirteen dollars ($241,374,013.00)
four hundred two million forty-five thousand
eight hundred forty-one dollars
($402,045,841.00):

School
Priority District Project
HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220

09-01 Laramie #1 Elementary School #2
09-02 Niobrara #1 High School Voc. Ag./
Transportation Facility
09-03 Goshen #1 Elementary/Middle/High School
Renovation
09-04 Campbell #1 Elementary School
09-05 Campbell #1 High School
Legislature Teton #1 High School
Legislature Sweetwater #1 High School

(v) For the following component level
major maintenance projects, twenty-five million
one hundred fifty-six thousand five hundred one
dollars ($25,156,501.00) fifty-four million nine
hundred eighty-nine thousand two hundred
seventeen dollars ($54,989,217.00):

School
Priority District Project

10-01 Uinta #1 Middle School
10-02 Teton #1 High School Voc. Building
HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220
10-03 Converse #2 Junior High/High School
10-04 Carbon #2 Middle/High School
10-05 Hot Springs #1 High School
10-06 Fremont #38 Elementary/High
School/Transportation Buildings
10-07 Sublette #1 Administrative Building/High
School
10-08 Converse #1 Middle School
10-09 Platte #1 Elementary School
10-10 Sublette #1 Administrative Building/High
School
10-11 Sublette #1 High School
10-12 Converse #1 High School
10-13 Sublette #9 Elementary School
10-14 Campbell #1 Elementary School
10-15 Platte #1 High School
10-16 Sheridan #2 High School
10-17 Uinta #1 Middle School
10-18 Fremont #14 High School
10-19 Hot Springs #1 Elementary School
10-20 Johnson #1 K-12 School
10-21 Converse #1 Elementary School
10-22 Big Horn #3 Elementary School
HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220
10-23 Converse #2 Intermediate School
10-24 Uinta #6 Intermediate School
10-25 Goshen #1 High School
10-26 Platte #1 Elementary School
10-27 Sheridan #2 Elementary School

(vii) For construction of the
following ancillary building projects, twenty-
seven million two hundred ninety-four thousand
six hundred eighty-four dollars ($27,294,684.00)
forty million eight hundred twenty-six thousand
one hundred eighty-eight dollars
($40,826,188.00):

School
Priority District Project

11-01.02 Lincoln #2 Transportation Facility
11-02.02 Crook #1 Transportation Facility
11-03.02 Platte #1 Transportation Facility
11-04 Campbell #1 Transportation Facility

(viii) For demolition of a middle
HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220
school in Platte county school district #1, a
high school and a transportation facility in
Campbell county school district #1 and an
elementary school in Albany county school
district #1, two million six hundred thirty-four
thousand six hundred ninety-eight dollars
($2,634,698.00) nine million eight hundred
ninety-one thousand two hundred forty-six dollars
($9,891,246.00). Any disposition or demolition of
buildings or facilities shall be subject to
commission approval and included in the
district's facility plan to ensure the
disposition or demolition protects the financial
interest of the state and is in the public
interest as required under W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi);

(xii) For unanticipated costs
associated with the projects funded under
paragraphs (j)(iii) through (xi) of this
subsection, ten million four hundred thirty-six
thousand eight hundred eighty-six dollars
($10,436,886.00) twenty-three million one hundred
fourteen thousand four hundred forty-two dollars
HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220
($23,114,442.00).

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, of the unexpended, obligated monies
appropriated from the school capital construction
account to the school facilities commission under
2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section
313(j)(xiii), up to thirteen million four hundred
thousand dollars ($13,400,000.00), or as much
thereof as is available, shall not revert upon
completion of the projects pursuant to 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 313(d),
and are hereby reappropriated to the school
facilities commission to supplement previous
appropriations for inflationary costs associated
with projects approved by the commission and
funded by the legislature. The original scope and
design of the projects for which these funds are
expended shall not be modified as a result of the
expenditure of the funds reappropriated under
this subsection. This reappropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
The commission shall report the expenditure of
HB0142

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0220
funds reappropriated under this subsection as
required under subsection (h) of this section.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0142